Alaska, session 34, SB192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 26.20.100 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (b) Plans and regulations formulated under (a)(1) of this section must adopt 06 the following designations for use in evacuation maps and other public messaging: 07 (1) "Level 1 Ready," indicated in green, to alert the public that an 08 emergency may exist in the area; 09 (2) "Level 2 Set," indicated in yellow, to alert the public that 10 evacuation of the area is imminent; 11 (3) "Level 3 Go," indicated in red, to alert the public that a dangerous 12 hazard exists and that an individual in the area should immediately evacuate the area. 13 * Sec. 2. AS 26.23.060(e) is amended to read: 14 (e) Each political subdivision shall ensure that a written local or 01 interjurisdictional disaster emergency plan for its area is prepared, maintained, and 02 distributed to all appropriate officials. The disaster emergency plan must include a 03 clear and complete statement of the emergency responsibilities of all local agencies 04 and officials. If the disaster emergency plan includes an evacuation plan, the 05 evacuation plan must use the designations set out in AS 26.20.100(b). 06 * Sec. 3. AS 26.23.075(a) is amended to read: 07 (a) An emergency plan prepared under AS 26.23.073 must include 08 (1) identification of facilities subject to the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 09 11001 - 11005 that are within the emergency planning district, identification of routes 10 likely to be used for the transportation of substances on the list of extremely hazardous 11 substances referred to in 42 U.S.C. 11002(a), and identification of additional facilities 12 contributing or subjected to additional risk due to their proximity to facilities subject 13 to the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 11001 - 11005, such as hospitals or natural gas 14 facilities; 15 (2) methods and procedures to be followed by facility owners and 16 operators and local emergency and medical personnel to respond to a release of 17 hazardous substances or a release of substances on the list of extremely hazardous 18 substances referred to in 42 U.S.C. 11002(a); 19 (3) designation of an emergency coordinator, as required under 20 AS 26.23.060(d), and facility emergency coordinators, who shall make determinations 21 necessary to implement the emergency plan; 22 (4) procedures providing reliable, effective, and timely notification by 23 the facility emergency coordinators to persons designated in the emergency plan, and 24 to the public, that a release has occurred, consistent with the emergency notification 25 requirements of 42 U.S.C. 11004; 26 (5) methods for determining the occurrence of a release and the area or 27 population likely to be affected by that release; 28 (6) a description of emergency equipment and facilities in the 29 community and at each facility in the community subject to the requirements of 42 30 U.S.C. 11001 - 11005, and an identification of the persons responsible for the 31 equipment and facilities; 01 (7) evacuation plans that use the designations set out in 02 AS 26.20.100(b) and that include [, INCLUDING] provisions for a precautionary 03 evacuation and alternative traffic routes; 04 (8) training programs, including schedules for training of local 05 emergency response and medical personnel; and 06 (9) methods and schedules for exercising the emergency plan. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.